Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 17 Cooperation in Implementation of Federal Food Safety Modernization

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2017.

26-2-440.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administration” means the United States Food and Drug Administration.

“Department” means the Georgia Department of Agriculture.

“Federal act” means the federal Food Safety Modernization Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-440

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 215, § 1/HB 176; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 26/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the introductory language of this Code section.

26-2-441.
Designation of cooperating agency.

The department, acting by and through its commissioner, is designated as the state agency responsible for cooperating with the administration under the provisions of the federal act.

In furtherance of its responsibilities under subsection (a) of this Code section, the department may:

Conduct inspections and take other regulatory actions as necessary to assist the administration in enforcement of the federal act; and

Enter into cooperative agreements with the administration to carry out the provisions of the federal act.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-441

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 215, § 1/HB 176.